Utah statutes.
62A-15-502.   Penalty for DUI conviction -- Amounts.
(1)  Courts of record and not of record may at sentencing assess against the
defendant, in addition to any fine, an amount that will fully compensate
agencies that treat the defendant for their costs in each case where a
defendant is convicted of violating:
(a)  Section 41-6a-502 or 41-6a-517;
(b)  a criminal prohibition resulting from a plea bargain after an original
charge of violating Section 41-6a-502; or
(c)  an ordinance that complies with the requirements of Subsection
41-6a-510(1).
(2)  The fee assessed shall be collected by the court or an entity appointed
by the court.
